District of Columbia statutes.
29-1013.01

Derivative action.

A member may maintain a derivative action in the Superior Court to enforce a right of a limited cooperative association if:

(1)

The member demands that the association bring an action to enforce the right; and

(2)

Any of the following occur:

(A)

The association does not, within 90 days after the member makes the demand, agree to bring the action;

(B)

The association notifies the member that it has rejected the demand;

(C)

Irreparable harm to the association would result by waiting 90 days after the member makes the demand;

(D)

The association agrees to bring an action demanded and fails to bring the action within a reasonable time; or

(E)

A demand under paragraph (1) of this subsection would be futile.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(j)(9)(A), 59 DCR 13171
This section is referenced in § 29-1013.03.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 added (2)(E) and made related changes.

Uniform Law: This section is based on § 1301 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.